Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-701.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 72-701.01 to 72-701.06 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Emergency Seat of State Government Act.

Laws 1959, c. 332, § 1, p. 1207.